Hawaii statutes.
[§346G-6] Hospital sustainability fee
assessments. (a) Hospitals shall pay the hospital sustainability fee
to the department in accordance with this chapter. The fee shall be divided
and paid in twelve equal installments on a monthly basis.

(b) The department shall collect, and each
hospital shall pay, the hospital sustainability fee not later than the thirtieth
day after the end of each calendar month; provided that if required federal
approvals have not been secured by the end of a calendar month the fees for
that month shall be paid within ten days after notification to the hospitals
that the required approvals have been received. [L 2012, c 217, pt of §2, §5;
am L 2013, c 141, pt of §1, §2; am L 2014, c 123, §2; am L 2015, c 70, §2; am L
2016, c 60, §2(4)]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next